test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-vaoma_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `vaoma: # Verb (72+73) `vaoma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     vaoma+V+Inf/mA: vaoma
     vaoma+V+Inf: [vaodaq, vaioq]
     vaoma+V+ActPrtPrc: vaonuq
     vaoma+V+PssPrtPrc: vaot
     vaoma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: vao
     vaoma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: vaos
     vaoma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: vaio
     vaoma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: vaio
